California, session 20252026, AB73.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18998.15 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:18998.15. (a) (1) Pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 18998.1, the department shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, develop criteria for a specialty certificate program and specialized training requirements for a Black Mental Health Navigator Certification.(2) The department shall solicit stakeholder feedback on the criteria for the certificate.(3) The department may engage a community-based organization with relevant expertise about mental health and wellness in Black communities to advise on or to develop the criteria.(b) The Black Mental Health Navigator Certification specialty certificate program and specialized training shall include comprehensive training in mental health resources and awareness, including, but not limited to, entry-level assessments, crisis intervention training for nonemergency cases, navigation support, and culturally specific practices relative to delivering public health and mental health assistance to help connect individuals with state resources, licensed mental health professionals, and wellness services.SEC. 2. Section 18998.35 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:18998.35. (a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the department shall collect and regularly publish data, not less than annually, including, but not limited to, both of the following:(1) The number of individuals certified, and corresponding demographic information on the individuals certified, including those who complete a specialty certificate program and specialized training, by each type of certificate.(2) The number of individuals who are actively employed in a community health worker role.(b) This section does not require the reporting of the names or personal identifying information.